Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Prohibitions

121.310.
Coercement
of employee’s vote prohibited.

No person shall coerce or direct any employee to vote for any political party or candidate for nomination or election to any office in this state, or threaten to discharge any employee if he votes for any candidate, or discharge any employee on account of his exercise of suffrage, or give out or circulate any statement or report that employees are expected or have been requested or directed by the employer, or by anyone acting for him, to vote for any person, group of persons or measure.

No corporation organized or authorized to do business in this state shall influence or attempt to influence, by bribe, favor, promise, inducement or otherwise, the vote or suffrage of any employee of such corporation against or in favor of any candidate, platform, principle or issue in any election held under the laws of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 193.

121.320.
Assessment
of state or federal employee prohibited.

No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain money by assessment or coercion from any state or federal employee with the purpose of using the money to promote or aid the candidacy of any person, or any political party, or any question to be voted upon by the voters of this state or any section or portion of this state in any state, national, district, county, city or precinct election, or primary election, or in securing delegates or in any manner where nominations are to be made by convention. Every assessment and each act of coercion shall constitute a separate offense.

The term “assessment,” as used in this section, means the fixing of any amount, to be given in money by any employee, and the soliciting of that amount or any amount in money from a person so assessed. The term “coercion,” as used in this section, means any threat of discharging any employee for failure to contribute any amount of money for campaign or political purposes, or any attempt to force contribution of any amount of money for political or campaign purposes by any influence, or discharging, demoting or reducing the salary or wages of any employee for failure to contribute portions of his salary or wages, or by putting such employee in fear in any manner.

The term “state or federal employee,” as used in this section, means any person who holds any appointive office in any department of the state or federal government, and who receives wages or salary for his work from the funds of the state or the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 194.

121.330.
Restrictions
on elected officials and their appointees in dealing with certain contributors
and fundraisers.

No elected official or any of his appointees shall knowingly award any nonbid contract with the governing authority which the elected official serves to any entity whose officers or employees, or the spouses of officers or employees, knowingly contributed in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate in any one (1) election to the election campaign of the elected official during the term of office following the election campaign in which the contributions were made.

No entity whose officers or employees, or the spouses of officers or employees, have knowingly contributed in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate in any one (1) election to the election campaign of any elected official shall knowingly receive any nonbid contract with the governing authority which the elected official serves during the term of office following the election campaign in which the contributions were made.

No elected official or any of his appointees shall knowingly award any nonbid contract, lease, or appointment to any office or board with the governing authority which the elected official serves to any person who has acted as a fundraiser by directly soliciting contributions to the election campaign of the elected official who secured in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in contributions in the aggregate in any one (1) election for the election campaign, or to his immediate family, employer, or employee, during the term of office following the election campaign in which the contributions were made, nor shall any award of a nonbid contract or lease with the governing authority knowingly be made to the entity in which the person has an interest during the term of office following the election campaign in which the contributions were made.

No person who has acted as a fundraiser by directly soliciting contributions for the election campaign of an elected official who secured in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in contributions in the aggregate in any one (1) election for the election campaign, nor his immediate family, employer, or employee, shall knowingly receive any nonbid contract, lease, or appointment to any office or board with the governing authority which the elected official serves during the term of office following the election campaign in which the contributions were made, nor shall an entity in which the person has an interest knowingly receive a nonbid contract or lease with the governing authority during the term of office following the election campaign in which the contributions were made.

For the purposes of this section, “entity” means any person, sole proprietorship, partnership, unincorporated association, unincorporated company, joint stock company, public service corporation, professional services corporation, corporation, or any other business organization.

For the purposes of this section, “immediate family” means the spouse of the person, the parent of the person or spouse, or the child of the person or spouse.

For the purposes of this section, “governing authority” means the elected legislative, executive, and judicial officers charged with the administration of the affairs of the political subdivision which they serve.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 288, § 16, effective July 14, 1992.

121.990.
Penalties.

Any corporation or any officer, agent, attorney, or employee of a corporation, who knowingly violates any of the provisions of KRS

121.025

, shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and, in the case of individuals, be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any corporation that knowingly violates any of the provisions of KRS 121.035(1) or KRS 121.310(2) shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each offense, and upon conviction its charter shall be forfeited or its authority to do business revoked.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of KRS 121.035(2),

121.045

,

121.055

,

121.150

to

121.230

, 121.310(1), or

121.320

shall, for each offense, be guilty of a Class D felony. Violations of KRS

121.150

to

121.230

shall include, but shall not be limited to, any of the following acts or omissions:

Failure to make required reports or to file reports at times specified;

Making any false statement or report;

Giving money under a fictitious name; or

Making any communication in violation of KRS 121.190(1).

The nomination for, or election to, an office of any candidate or slate of candidates who knowingly violates any provision of KRS

121.150

to

121.220

, or whose campaign treasurer knowingly violates any provision of KRS

121.150

to

121.220

, with the knowledge of that candidate or slate of candidates, shall be void, and, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, the office shall be declared vacant and the officeholder shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve, and the office or candidacy shall be filled as provided by law for the filling of a vacancy. An action to declare a vacancy under this subsection may be brought by the registry, the Attorney General, any candidate or slate of candidates for the office sought to be declared vacant, or any qualified voter.

The Attorney General, Commonwealth’s attorney, the registry, or any qualified voter may sue for injunctive relief to compel compliance with the provisions of KRS

121.056

and KRS

121.120

to

121.230

.

The Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney for the county in which the candidate or slated candidates reside shall be the chief prosecutor upon receipt of a written request from the registry and shall prosecute any violator under this chapter. In the event he fails or refuses to prosecute a violator, upon written request from the registry, the Attorney General shall appoint a special prosecutor with full authority to carry out the provisions of this section.

Any officeholder who knowingly violates the provisions of KRS 121.150(12) shall, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, have his office declared vacant and shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve.

Any Governor or any gubernatorial appointee who knowingly appoints, approves the appointment, or participates in the appointing of any person to any appointive state office or position in violation of KRS 121.056(1) shall be guilty of a Class D felony and, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, have his office declared vacant and shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve.

Any person who knowingly receives an appointment to any appointive state office or position in violation of KRS 121.056(1) shall be guilty of a Class D felony and, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, have his office declared vacant, forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive, and shall be ineligible to receive an appointment to a state office or position for a period of five (5) years from the date of a final judicial determination of guilt.

Any elected or appointed state officeholder who knowingly awards or participates in the awarding of a contract with the Commonwealth of Kentucky to a person or entity in violation of KRS 121.056(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony and, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, have his office declared vacant and shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve.

Any person or entity who knowingly receives a contract with the Commonwealth of Kentucky in violation of KRS 121.056(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Upon conviction, the contract shall be canceled, and the person or entity convicted shall be ineligible to receive a contract with the Commonwealth of Kentucky for a period of five (5) years from the date of a final judicial determination of guilt.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of KRS 121.056(3) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who knowingly fails to pay a civil penalty, assessed by the registry or a judicial panel pursuant to KRS

121.140

for violation of campaign finance laws, shall be disqualified from filing for public office until such penalty is paid or the registry rules that settlement has otherwise been made.

Any elected official who knowingly awards or participates in the awarding of a nonbid contract or whose appointee knowingly awards or participates in the awarding of a nonbid contract in violation of KRS 121.330(1) shall be guilty of a Class D felony and, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, have his office declared vacant and shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve.

Any entity who knowingly receives a nonbid contract with a governing authority in violation of KRS 121.330(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Upon conviction, the nonbid contract shall be canceled, and the entity convicted shall be ineligible to receive a nonbid contract with a governing authority for a period of five (5) years from the date of final judicial determination of guilt.

Any elected official who knowingly awards or participates in awarding of a nonbid contract, lease, or appointment to an office or board or whose appointee knowingly awards or participates in the awarding of a nonbid contract, lease, or appointment to an office or board in violation of KRS 121.330(3) shall be guilty of a Class D felony and, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, have his office declared vacant and shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve.

Any fundraiser who knowingly receives a nonbid contract, lease, or appointment to an office or board or any entity in which he has an interest who knowingly receives a nonbid contract or lease in violation of KRS 121.330(4) shall be guilty of a Class D felony;

Any immediate family member, employer, or employee of a fundraiser who knowingly receives a nonbid contract, lease, or appointment to an office or board in violation of KRS 121.330(4) shall be guilty of a Class D felony; and

Upon conviction, the nonbid contract, lease, or appointment shall be canceled, and the person or entity convicted shall be ineligible to receive a nonbid contract, lease, or appointment with a governing authority for a period of five (5) years from the date of a final judicial determination of guilt.

Any appointed or elected state office holder or any other person who knowingly violates the provisions of KRS 121.120(5) shall be guilty of a Class D felony. In the event a candidate has assumed office, upon a final judicial determination of guilt, his office shall be declared vacant and he shall forfeit all benefits which he would have been entitled to receive had he continued to serve.

Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of KRS 121.065(1) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, §§
195 and 196; 1980, ch. 292, § 12, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 100, §
10, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 168, §
2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988 Ky. Acts ch. 118, §
3, effective 1991; 1988, ch. 341, §
48, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, §
30, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 463, §
14, effective July 14, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1994, ch. 279, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 458, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 153, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 105, § 10, effective March 16, 2005.